Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-414
Board; employees; compensation.

The board of trustees shall have power to pass bylaws for the regulation of its business and affairs, and in such bylaws shall provide for the appointment or employment of such agents, servants and employees, subject to the order of the board, as it may find necessary or expedient in the conduct of its affairs and business, and shall fix the compensation and term or terms of service of the agents, servants and employees so appointed.

Laws 1941, c. 148, § 5, p. 585;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-415;

R.S.1943, § 72-414.